Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-348
Act, how cited.

Sections 28-348 to 28-387 shall be known and may be cited as the Adult Protective Services Act.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB1051, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB934, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB1055, § 1.
July 18, 2026